Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201319-5202
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature
finds and declares as follows:

(1) Nebraska's
municipalities are important to the social and economic vitality of the state,
and many municipalities are struggling to cope with vacant, abandoned, and
tax-delinquent properties;

(2) Vacant, abandoned, and tax-delinquent
properties represent lost revenue to municipalities and large costs associated
with demolition, safety hazards, and the deterioration of neighborhoods;

(3) There is
an overriding public need to confront the problems caused by vacant, abandoned,
and tax-delinquent properties through the creation of new tools for municipalities
to use to turn vacant spaces into vibrant places; and

(4) Land banks are one
of the tools that can be utilized by municipalities to facilitate the return
of vacant, abandoned, and tax-delinquent properties to productive use.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 2.